Massachusetts, session 194th, S766.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34 of Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 4 by inserting after the words “federal savings banks”
the following words:- federal credit unions,
SECTION 2. Section 34 of Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 6 by striking out the words “and cooperative banks”
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- , cooperative banks, and credit unions
SECTION 3. Section 54 of Chapter 44 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 15 after the word “banks” the following
words:- , or in paid up shares or deposits of credit unions, or in paid up shares or deposits of
federal credit unions doing business in the commonwealth
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 55 of Chapter 44 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 27 by inserting after the word “banks,” the following
words:- credit unions or federal credit unions,
SECTION 5. Section 55A of Chapter 44 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 4 by inserting after the words “savings bank,” the
following words:- credit unions or federal credit unions,
SECTION 6. Section 29 of Chapter 171 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the fifth paragraph the following
paragraph:-
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any credit union or federal credit union may
accept public funds pursuant to Section 34 of Chapter 29 and Sections 54, 55 and 55A of Chapter
44 as provided for therein; provided, however, that the total of such public funds received shall
not exceed, at any time, twenty-five percent of the assets of the credit union or federal credit
union.
of 2